Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 30 INCOME TAX
§ 63-3055. Release or subordination of income tax lien.

The state tax commission may at any time release all or any portion of the property subject to the lien from the lien, or it may subordinate the lien to other liens if it determines:

That the taxes, penalties or interests are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property of the taxpayer; or

That the release or subordination of the lien will not endanger or jeopardize the collection of such taxes, penalties or interest; or

That a surety bond or securities satisfactory to secure deposits of public funds have been posted, deposited or pledged with the state tax commission in an amount sufficient to secure the payment of such taxes, penalties, or interest; or

All or a part of such taxes, penalties or interest have been paid.

If the tax commission determines that the filing of the notice of any lien was erroneous, the tax commission shall expeditiously, and, to the extent practicable, within fourteen (14) days after such determination, issue a certificate of release of such lien and shall include in such certificate a statement that such filing was erroneous. A lien is not an erroneous lien if it is accurate at the time the lien is filed.

Where an officer or employee of the tax commission knowingly or negligently fails to release a notice of lien, a taxpayer may bring an action against the tax commission pursuant to section 63-3074, Idaho Code, in district court seeking direct economic damages and costs. A taxpayer must first notify the tax commission that a release was not issued timely.

A certificate by the state tax commission to the effect that any property has been released from the lien herein provided for, or that such lien has been subordinated to other liens, shall be conclusive evidence that the property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated, as provided in the certificate.

§ 63-3056. Action to enforce lien.

In any case where there has been a refusal or neglect to pay any tax, including interest, penalty, additional amount or addition to such tax, together with any costs that may accrue in addition thereto, the attorney general of the state, at the request of the state tax commission, may file an action in the district court for Idaho in the county where the property encumbered by the lien is located to enforce the lien of the state for such tax upon any property and rights to property, whether real or personal, or to subject any such property and rights to property owned by the delinquent, or in which he has any right, title, or interest, to the payment of such tax. Such action shall be commenced and pursued in like manner as is now provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages and other liens in chapter 1, title 6, Idaho Code, which is hereby made applicable to the tax liens arising under this chapter to the extent that such provisions are not inconsistent with other provisions of this chapter, provided, however, that the redemption period may be fixed by the judge of the court wherein the proceeding was filed, but in no event shall the period of redemption exceed the time prescribed by sections 11-402 and 11-403, Idaho Code. Such action may be commenced at any time within five (5) years following the date such lien was filed, or was last extended.

§ 63-3057. Distraint on personal property.

In addition to all other remedies or actions provided by this act, it shall be lawful for the tax commission, or any of its agents or deputies, to collect any taxes (the word “taxes,” as used in this section including any deficiencies in respect of such taxes) with such interest, penalties, and other additional amounts as are permitted by law, by distraint and sale, in the manner provided herein, of the property of any person liable to pay any taxes, interest, penalties, or other additional amounts, who neglects or refuses to pay the same within thirty (30) days from the mailing of notice and demand for payment thereof, and who has not appealed from the assessment of such taxes, interest, penalties and other additional amounts pursuant to the provisions of the act or who has not satisfied or discharged any lien filed under this act. The term “property” as used herein shall be construed to mean personal property, both tangible and intangible, any right, title, and interest to such personal property and shall include, without limitation, stocks, securities, bank accounts, and evidences of debt.

In conjunction with the remedy provided in subsection (1) of this section, the state tax commission may file an action in the district court where a taxpayer resides or has his principal place of business or in which the property subject to distraint under this section is located for a writ of possession under chapter 3, title 8, Idaho Code. In such an action, the sheriff shall designate the state tax commission as the keeper of the property under section 8-305, Idaho Code, and after expiration of the five (5) day period provided in section 8-308, Idaho Code, shall relinquish all custody and responsibility for such property to the state tax commission. The state tax commission may proceed in regard to such property as provided for property seized under a warrant issued by the commission under this chapter.

§ 63-3058. Exempt property.

Property exempt from distraint shall be the same property as is exempt from execution under the provisions of chapter 6, title 11, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3059. Levy or distraint warrant.

In case of neglect or refusal to pay taxes or deficiencies as hereinabove provided, the state tax commission may levy, or, by warrant issued under its own hand, authorize its agents or employees or a sheriff or deputy, to levy upon, seize and sell all property, except such as is exempt by the preceding section, belonging to such person, for the payment of the amount due or for the enforcement of any lien authorized and filed pursuant to this chapter.

Any person in possession of, or obligated with respect to, property or rights to property subject to levy upon which a levy has been made who, upon demand by the state tax commission or by a sheriff or deputy, surrenders such property or rights to property, or discharges such obligation, to the state tax commission shall be discharged from any obligation or liability to the delinquent taxpayer and any other person with respect to such property or rights to property arising from such surrender or payment.

Any person who fails or refuses to surrender any property or rights to property, subject to levy, shall be liable to the state of Idaho in a sum equal to the value of the property or rights not so surrendered, but not exceeding the amount of taxes for the collection of which such levy has been made, together with costs and interest on such sum at the rate established under section 63-3045, Idaho Code, from the date of such levy.

Any amount, other than costs, recovered under this section shall be credited against the tax liability for the collection of which such levy was made.

§ 63-3060. Proceedings on levy or distraint.

When a warrant is issued by the state tax commission for the collection of any tax, interest, penalty, additional amount or addition to such tax, imposed by this chapter or for the enforcement of any lien authorized by this chapter, it shall be directed to any sheriff or agent of the state tax commission, and any such warrant shall have the same force and effect as a writ of execution. It may and shall be levied and sale made pursuant to it in the same manner and with the same force and effect as a levy and sale pursuant to a writ of execution. The sheriff or agent of the state tax commission, shall receive upon the completion of his services pursuant to said warrant, and the state tax commission is authorized to pay to said sheriff or agent of the state tax commission, the same fees, commissions and expenses pursuant to said warrant as are provided by law for similar services pursuant to a writ of execution, except that fees for publication in a newspaper shall be subject to approval by the state tax commission rather than by the court; said fees, commissions and expenses shall be an obligation of the taxpayer and may be collected from the taxpayer by virtue of the warrant. Any such warrant issued by the state tax commission shall show the name and last known address of the taxpayer liable for the amount, and shall show the year for which such tax, interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax, is due and the amount thereof, and the fact that the state tax commission has complied with all provisions of this chapter in the determination of the amount required to be paid, and that the tax, interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax, is due and payable according to law.

§ 63-3060A. Continuous execution on individual earnings.

Where an execution or garnishment against earnings for a state tax liability is served upon any person or upon the state of Idaho, and there is in possession of such person or the state of Idaho any such earnings of the individual debtor, the execution and the garnishment shall operate continuously and shall require such person or the state of Idaho to withhold the nonexempt portion of earnings at each succeeding earnings disbursement interval until released by the state tax commission or until the dollar amount specifically set forth on the record of assessment, identified in section 63-3045A, Idaho Code, and subject to garnishment as of the date the tax warrant is issued, is discharged or satisfied in full. The proportion of earnings subject to garnishment pursuant to this section, as compared to total gross taxable earnings, shall be limited to twenty-five percent (25%), except if the federal government is also garnishing the earnings of such person then the garnishment shall be limited to ten percent (10%). All garnishment or execution against earnings for the payments of any tax owed to the state of Idaho shall be governed by this section. For purposes of this section, earnings are gross taxable earnings from sources identified in section 11-206(1), Idaho Code.

§ 63-3061. Successive seizures.

Whenever any property which is seized and sold by virtue of the foregoing provisions is not sufficient to satisfy the claim of the state for which distraint or seizure is made, the sheriff or agent of the state tax commission, may thereafter, and as often as the same may be necessary, proceed to seize and sell in like manner any other property liable to seizure of the taxpayer against whom such claim exists, until the amount due from such taxpayer, together with all expenses, is fully paid.

§ 63-3061A. Notice of levy and distraint.

The state tax commission shall, at the time of levy, provide to the taxpayer and to any person in possession of the property subject to distraint, written notice of levy and distraint. The written notice of levy and distraint may be:

Given in person;

Left at the dwelling place or usual place of business of such person; or

Sent by first class mail to such person’s last known address.

Service may be made by other means, including electronic means as provided in chapter 50, title 28, Idaho Code, the uniform electronic transactions act, when agreed upon by the state tax commission and the party served.

§ 63-3062. Production of books.

All persons, and officers of companies or corporations, are required on demand of a sheriff or agent of the state tax commission, about to distrain, or having distrained on any property or rights of property, to exhibit all books containing evidence or statements relating to the subject of distraint, or the property or rights of property liable to distraint for the tax due.

§ 63-3063. Collection by distraint not exclusive.

The distraint provisions of this act shall not be deemed exclusive but shall be in addition to any and all other existing remedies provided by law for the enforcement of the revenue laws of the state of Idaho.

§ 63-3064. Other remedies preserved.

Nothing in the act shall be construed so as to prohibit the commencing of any action at law by the state tax commission to collect any tax, interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax, due under the provisions of this act, whenever in the opinion of the state tax commission or the attorney general the commencement of such action is a more appropriate method of collecting such tax, interest, penalty, additional amount, or addition to such tax.

The state tax commission is authorized to apply for and the court to grant a temporary or permanent injunction enjoining any person from violating or continuing to violate any of the provisions of this act or regulations promulgated under this act notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

§ 63-3065. Jeopardy assessments.

If the tax commission finds that a taxpayer is about to depart from the state of Idaho or to remove his property therefrom, or to conceal himself or his property therein, or to do any other act tending to prejudice or to render wholly or partially ineffectual proceedings to collect the tax for the taxable year then last past or the taxable year then current unless such proceedings be brought without delay, the tax commission shall declare the taxable period for such taxpayer immediately terminated and shall cause notice of such findings and declaration to be given the taxpayer, together with a demand for immediate payment of the tax for the taxable period so declared terminated and of the tax for the preceding taxable year or so much of said taxes as is unpaid, whether or not the time otherwise allowed by law for filing returns and paying the tax has expired; and such taxes shall thereupon become immediately due and payable. The provisions of section 63-4003(1)(a), Idaho Code, shall not apply to a notice under this section and communications related thereto. In any proceedings in court brought to enforce payment of taxes made due and payable by virtue of the provisions of this section the finding of the tax commission, made as herein provided, whether made after notice to the taxpayer or not, shall be for all purposes prima facie evidence of the taxpayer’s design.

Collection procedures may be instituted immediately; however, any taxpayer deeming himself aggrieved by any act of the tax commission pursuant to the provisions of this section may, within sixty-three (63) days of receipt of said notice, petition the tax commission for a redetermination or commence action for refund or redetermination upon payment of the tax together with interest and penalty or upon filing a bond in the amount of the assessment.

A taxpayer who is not in default in making any return or paying any taxes assessed under this chapter may furnish to the state of Idaho under regulations to be prescribed by the tax commission, security approved by the tax commission that he will duly make the return next thereafter required to be filed and pay the tax next thereafter required to be paid. The tax commission may approve and accept in like manner security for return and payment of taxes made due and payable by virtue of the provisions of this section.

If security is approved and accepted pursuant to the provisions of this section and such further or other security with respect to the tax or taxes covered thereby is given as the tax commission shall from time to time find necessary and require, payment of such taxes shall not be enforced by any proceedings under the provisions of this section prior to the expiration of the time otherwise allowed for paying such respective taxes.

In the case of a bona fide resident of the state of Idaho about to depart from the state of Idaho the tax commission may, at its discretion, waive any or all of the requirements placed upon the taxpayer by this section.

§ 63-3065A. Jurisdiction over nonresidents.

A deficiency assessed and due and payable by a person not within the state may be prosecuted against such person by an action in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter or in personam jurisdiction of such person in any action for taxes, penalty and interest owed the state tax commission. Notice shall be given and the action shall proceed in accordance with the applicable rules and statutes regulating civil procedure. In the event such notice shall be by publication, notice shall also be mailed by certified mail to such person at his last known address.

§ 63-3066. Legal adviser.

The attorney general of the state shall be the legal counselor and adviser of the tax commission.

§ 63-3067. Revenue received — State refund account.

A sum equal to the amount withheld under section 63-3035A, Idaho Code, shall be distributed fifty percent (50%) to the public school income fund to be utilized to facilitate and provide substance abuse programs in the public school system, and fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed to the counties to be utilized for county juvenile probation services. These funds shall be distributed quarterly to the counties based upon the percentage the population of the county bears to the population of the state as a whole.

All moneys except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, and except as hereinafter provided, received by the state of Idaho under this act shall be deposited by the state tax commission, as received by it, with the state treasurer and shall be placed in and become a part of the general account [fund] under the custody of the state treasurer. Providing however, that an amount equal to twenty percent (20%) of the amount deposited with the state treasurer shall be placed in the “state refund account” which is hereby created for the purpose of repaying overpayments and for the purpose of paying any other erroneous receipts illegally assessed or collected, penalties collected without authority and taxes and licenses unjustly assessed, collected or which are excessive in amount. Whenever necessary for the purpose of making prompt payment of refunds, the board of examiners, upon request from the state tax commission, and after review, may authorize the state tax commission to transfer any additional specific amount from income tax collections to the “state refund account.” There is appropriated out of the state refund account so much thereof as may be necessary for the payment of the refunds herein provided. Claims for, and payment of refunds under the provisions of this section shall be made in the same manner as other claims against the state of Idaho.

Any unencumbered balance remaining in the state refund account on June 30 of each and every year in excess of the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) shall be transferred to the general fund and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed on such dates to make such transfers unless the board of examiners, which is hereby authorized to do so, changes the date of transfer or sum to be transferred.

§ 63-3067A. Income tax refund or payment designation by individuals to trust accounts.

Every individual who:

Has a refund due and payable for overpayment of taxes under this chapter may designate all or any portion thereof to be deposited in a trust account specified in subsection (3) of this section; or

Has an income tax liability may, in addition to his tax obligation, include a donation to be deposited in a trust account specified in subsection (3) of this section.

A designation under subsection (1) of this section may be made in any taxable year in such manner and form as prescribed by the state tax commission. The manner and form so prescribed shall be a conspicuous portion of the principal form provided for the purpose of individual taxation.

The trust accounts authorized to receive moneys designated under subsection (1) of this section are:

The fish and game set-aside account created in section 36-111, Idaho Code;

The children’s trust fund created in section 39-6007, Idaho Code;

The special olympics Idaho fund created in section 57-823, Idaho Code;

The Idaho guard and reserve family support fund created in section 57-820, Idaho Code;

The Idaho food bank fund created in section 57-824, Idaho Code;

The veterans support fund created in section 65-209, Idaho Code; and

The American red cross of greater Idaho fund created in section 57-821, Idaho Code.

Prior to the distribution of funds into any of the trust accounts specified in subsection (3) of this section from the refund account, the state tax commission shall retain funds for the commission’s costs for collecting and administering the moneys in the accounts as follows: three thousand dollars ($3,000) from each account for start-up costs during the first year of collections, and three thousand dollars ($3,000) or twenty percent (20%) of the moneys remitted to each account during the fiscal year, whichever is less, from each account during each fiscal year thereafter, which amounts are hereby appropriated to the state tax commission.

§ 63-3067B. Sunsetting designations.

The designations referred to in section 63-3067A, Idaho Code, shall expire and no longer appear on the income tax return form when:

For each of two (2) consecutive calendar years, the amount received by the state tax commission that is designated for a particular trust fund named in section 63-3067A, Idaho Code, fails to equal or exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); and

After one (1) year when collections fail to equal or exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), the state tax commission has notified the appropriate agency that:

The amount received by the state tax commission that is designated for that particular trust fund failed to equal or exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); and

The amount received by the state tax commission that is designated for the particular trust fund in the next subsequent year fails to equal or exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).

As used in this section, “appropriate agency” means the agency of the state of Idaho that is responsible for administering the programs benefiting from the fund to which amounts designated under section 63-3067A, Idaho Code, are distributed. If no agency of the state of Idaho has such responsibility, the term means such other private or public entity that is the principal beneficiary of the funds.

The state tax commission shall report annually to the house revenue and taxation committee on the trust funds that have failed to meet the necessary monetary threshold for collections for the prior two (2) years.

§ 63-3067C. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 63-3067D. Designation by taxpayer — Opportunity scholarship.

Every taxpayer who has a refund due and payable for overpayment of taxes under the provisions of this chapter may designate any portion of such refund to be remitted to the state board of education or the board of regents of the university of Idaho for the purpose of awarding opportunity scholarships pursuant to chapter 56, title 33, Idaho Code. Every taxpayer who has an income tax liability may, in addition to his tax obligation, include a donation of any amount to be remitted to the state board of education for the purpose of awarding opportunity scholarships pursuant to section 33-4303, Idaho Code. Such moneys shall be deposited into the opportunity scholarship program account pursuant to section 33-4303, Idaho Code.

A designation under subsection (1) of this section may be made in any taxable year in such manner and form as prescribed by the state tax commission. The manner and form so prescribed shall be a conspicuous portion of the principal form provided for the purpose of individual taxation.

Prior to the distribution of funds into the opportunity scholarship program account as provided in subsection (1) of this section from the refund account, the state tax commission shall retain funds for the commission’s costs for collecting and administering the moneys in the account as follows: three thousand dollars ($3,000) from the opportunity scholarship program account for start-up costs during the first year of collections, and three thousand dollars ($3,000) or twenty percent (20%) of the moneys remitted to the opportunity scholarship program account pursuant to this section during the fiscal year, whichever is less, from the opportunity scholarship program account during each fiscal year thereafter, which amounts are hereby appropriated to the state tax commission.

§ 63-3067E. Designation by individuals

United States olympic account. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3068. Period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency and collection of tax.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a notice of deficiency, as provided in section 63-3045, Idaho Code, for the tax imposed in this chapter shall be issued within three (3) years from either the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or from the date the return was filed, whichever is later.

If an assessment has been made as provided in this chapter, then such tax shall be collected either by levy, or by a proceeding brought in court, within a period of twelve (12) years from the date of entry of the record of assessment required by section 63-3045A, Idaho Code, of the tax and provided, further, that this shall not be in derogation of any of the remedies elsewhere provided in this chapter.

In the case of a fraudulent return or a false return with the intent to evade the tax imposed in this chapter, or a willful attempt in any manner to defeat or evade the tax imposed in this chapter, a notice of deficiency may be issued, the tax may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for collection of such tax may be begun without assessment, at any time.

In the case of a failure to file a return, for any reason, a notice of deficiency may be issued, the tax imposed in this chapter may be assessed, or a proceeding in court for collection of such tax may be begun without assessment, at any time.

In the case of income received during the lifetime of a decedent, or by his estate during the period of administration, a notice of deficiency shall be issued, a claim shall be made, the tax shall be assessed or any proceeding in court without assessment for the collection of such tax shall be begun, within twelve (12) months after written request for prompt action is filed with the state tax commission by the executor, administrator, or other fiduciary representing the estate of such decedent. This subsection shall not apply if the return for which the request for prompt action relates has not been filed with the state tax commission.

When Idaho taxable income or tax credits for any taxable year have been adjusted as a result of a final federal determination, the period of limitation for issuing a notice of deficiency shall be reopened and shall not expire until the later of one (1) year from the date of delivery of the final federal determination to the state tax commission by the taxpayer, three (3) years from the due date of the return, without regard to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the return was filed. For purposes of this subsection the term “final federal determination” shall mean the final resolution of all issues which were adjusted by the internal revenue service. When the final federal determination is submitted, the taxpayer shall also submit copies of all schedules and written explanations provided by the internal revenue service. Upon the expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and (m) of this section, only those specific items of income, deductions, gains, losses, or credits which were adjusted in the final federal determination shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing Idaho income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such adjustments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.

If an adjustment, which was made within the period of limitations as provided in this section, affects the amount of tax credit, net operating loss, or capital loss, claimed in a taxable year other than the tax year in which the adjustment is made, then adjustments to the credit, net operating loss, or capital loss claimed in such other tax year may be made and a resulting notice of deficiency may be issued even though such notice of deficiency would otherwise be barred under the provisions of this section.
(h) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, when an amended Idaho return is filed within the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and (m) of this section, the period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency shall be three (3) years from the date the amended return was filed. However, upon the expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and (m) of this section, only those specific items of income, deductions, gains, losses, or credits, which were adjusted in the amended Idaho return shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing Idaho income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such adjustments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.

If a taxpayer has filed an amended federal return, and no corresponding Idaho amended return has been filed with the state tax commission, then the period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency shall be reopened and shall not expire until three (3) years from the date of delivery to the tax commission by the taxpayer of the amended federal return. However, upon the expiration of the period of limitations as provided in subsections (a) and (m) of this section, then only those specific items of income, deductions, gains, losses, or credits, which were adjusted in the amended federal return shall be subject to adjustment for purposes of recomputing Idaho income, deductions, gains, losses, credits, and the effect of such adjustments on Idaho allocations and apportionments.

(j) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, a notice of deficiency, related to items on the return of any pass-through entity, as defined in this section, which other taxpayers are required by law to report, shall be issued to such other taxpayers within the later of three (3) years from the due date of the other taxpayers’ return, without regard to extensions, three (3) years from the date the other taxpayers’ returns were filed, or three (3) years from the date of filing of the pass-through entity’s return. If the pass-through entity files an amended return, notices of deficiency may be issued to the other taxpayers within three (3) years from the date the amended return for the pass-through entity was filed with the state tax commission. If the pass-through entity files an amended return with the internal revenue service, or the internal revenue service issues a final determination to the pass-through entity, then the period of limitations for issuing a notice of deficiency to the other taxpayers shall be reopened and shall not expire until three (3) years from the date of delivery to the tax commission by the pass-through entity of the amended federal return or the later of one (1) year from the date of delivery to the state tax commission by the pass-through entity of the final federal determination, three (3) years from the due date of the pass-through entity’s return, without regard to extensions, or three (3) years from the date the pass-through entity’s return was filed.

(k) For purposes of this section, “pass-through entity” means a partnership, S corporation, trust, limited liability company or any other entity whose items of income, deductions, gains, losses and credits must be reported by other taxpayer(s). For further purposes of this section, the term “other taxpayer” shall include, by way of unlimiting example, such taxpayers as partners, shareholders, beneficiaries, joint venturers or investors.

(
l
) In the case of a duplicate return filed under section 63-217(1)(b), Idaho Code, the limitation under this section shall be the later of one (1) year from the filing of the duplicate return or the date otherwise applicable under this section.

(m) Prior to the expiration of the time prescribed in this section for the issuance of a notice of deficiency for the tax imposed in this chapter, both the state tax commission, its delegate or deputy, and the taxpayer may consent in writing to extend the period of time within which a notice of deficiency may be issued. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon. When a pass-through entity extends the period of limitations in accordance with this subsection, the period of limitations for the other taxpayers is automatically extended for the same period for the purpose of issuing a notice of deficiency to the other taxpayers reflecting the adjustments to the pass-through entity’s return.

(n) The expiration of the period of limitations as provided in this section shall be suspended for the time period during which the state tax commission is prohibited from issuing a notice of deficiency, making the assessment, or from collecting by levy or a proceeding in court, and for thirty (30) days thereafter.

(o) For the purposes of this section, “return” includes a notice of deficiency determination issued by the state tax commission when no return was filed by the taxpayer. Such a return is deemed filed on the date the taxes determined by the state tax commission are assessed.

§ 63-3069. Notice of adjustment of federal or state tax liability.

Upon final determination of any deficiency or refund of federal taxes, the taxpayer is required to send written notice to the state tax commission within one hundred twenty (120) days of the final determination.

Upon final determination of any deficiency or refund of income tax due to another state or territory to which the credit for taxes paid another state or territory applies, as provided in section 63-3029, Idaho Code, the taxpayer is required to send written notice to the state tax commission within one hundred twenty (120) days of the final determination.

If the notice required by this section is not sent by the taxpayer to the state tax commission within one hundred twenty (120) days of the final determination, the taxpayer will be subject to the negligence penalty provided by section 63-3046, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3069A. Special statute of limitations.

When a final determination of any income tax due to another state or territory changes the amount of the credit for taxes paid to another state or territory as provided in section 63-3029, Idaho Code:

A claim for any credit or refund resulting from the change shall be filed within the later of:

The time required by section 63-3072, Idaho Code; or

One (1) year of the date the adjustment became final under the laws of the other state or territory.

The period of limitation for issuing a notice of deficiency shall not expire until the later of:

The time provided by section 63-3068, Idaho Code; or

One (1) year from the date of delivery to the state tax commission by the taxpayer of the notice required by section 63-3069, Idaho Code.

§ 63-3070. False return or failure to file return. [Repealed.]

§ 63-3071. Destruction of old returns.

After the expiration of the period of limitations fixed in section 63-3068, Idaho Code, the state tax commission may destroy old returns unless an earlier destruction is authorized in section 63-218, Idaho Code.